Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3602
Pretrial diversion program; established.

The county attorney of any county may establish a pretrial diversion program with the concurrence of the county board. Any city attorney may establish a pretrial diversion program with the concurrence of the governing body of the city. Such programs shall be established pursuant to sections 29-3603 and 29-3605 to 29-3609.

Laws 1979, LB 573, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 295, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 2.